Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Assault and Reckless Endangerment.

Collateral references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d, Assault and Battery, § 1 et seq.

6A C.J.S., Assault, § 1 et seq.

Indecent proposal to woman as assault, 12 ALR2d 971.

Effect of failure or refusal of court, in robbery prosecution, to instruct on assault and battery, 58 ALR2d 808.

Assault with intent to commit unnatural sex act upon minor as affected by latter’s consent, 65 ALR2d 748.

Admissibility, in prosecution for assault or similar offense involving physical violence, of extent or effect of victim’s injuries, 87 ALR2d 926.

Criminal responsibility for assault and battery by operation of mechanically defective motor vehicle, 88 ALR2d 1165.

Criminal liability for excessive or improper punishment inflicted on child by parent, teacher, or one in loco parentis, 89 ALR2d 396.

Deadly or dangerous weapon, intent to do physical harm as essential element of crime of assault with, 92 ALR2d 635.

Admissibility of evidence of uncommunicated threats on issue of self-defense in prosecution for assault, 98 ALR2d 195.

Admissibility of evidence as to other’s character or reputation for turbulence on question of self-defense by one charged with assault or homicide, 1 ALR3d 571.

Relationship with assailant’s wife as provocation depriving defendant of right of self-defense, 9 ALR3d 933.

Impotency as defense to charge of rape, attempt to rape, or assault with intent to commit rape, 23 ALR3d 1351.

Duty to retreat as condition of self-defense when one is attacked at his office, or place of business or employment, 41 ALR3d 584.

Unintentional killing of or injury to third person during attempted self-defense,
55 ALR3d 620.

Consent as defense to charge of criminal assault and battery, 58 ALR3d 662.

Liability of owner or operator of theatre or other amusement to patron assaulted by another patron, 75 ALR3d 441.

Attempted robbery, or assault to commit robbery, as affected by intent to collect or secure debt or claim, 88 ALR3d 1309.

Criminal responsibility for physical measures undertaken in connection with treatment of mentally disordered patient, 99 ALR3d 854.

Pocket or clasp knife as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statute aggravating offenses such as assault, robbery, or homicide, 100 ALR3d 287.

Validity and construction of penal statute prohibiting child abuse, 1 ALR4th 38.

Constitutionality of assault and battery laws limited to protection of females only or which provide greater penalties for males than for females, 5 ALR4th 708.

Walking cane as deadly or dangerous weapon for purpose of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 8 ALR4th 842.

Single act affecting multiple victims as constituting multiple assaults or homicides, 8 ALR4th 960.

Criminal responsibility of husband for rape, or assault to commit rape, on wife. 24 ALR4th 105.

Sufficiency of evidence to establish criminal participation by individual involved in gang fight or assault, 24 ALR4th 243.

Liability of one who provides, by sale or otherwise, firearm or ammunition to adult who shoots another, 39 ALR4th 517.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility, 68 ALR4th 507.

Kicking as aggravated assault, or assault with dangerous or deadly weapon, 19 ALR5th 823.

Liability of owner or operator of shopping center, or business housed therein, for injury to patron on premises from criminal assault by third party, 31 ALR5th 550.

Automobile as dangerous or deadly weapon within meaning of assault or battery statute, 31 ALR5th 550.

Admissibility of expert or opinion evidence of battered-woman syndrome on issue of self-defense. 58 ALR5th 749.

Dog as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 124 ALR5th 657.

Parts of the human body, other than feet, as deadly or dangerous weapons for purposes of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 67 ALR6th 103.

Sec. 11.41.200.
Assault in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of assault in the first degree if

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to another by means of a dangerous instrument;

with intent to cause serious physical injury to another, the person causes serious physical injury to any person;

the person knowingly engages in conduct that results in serious physical injury to another under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to another by repeated assaults using a dangerous instrument, even if each assault individually does not cause serious physical injury; or

that person knowingly causes another to become unconscious by means of a dangerous instrument; in this paragraph, “dangerous instrument” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)(15)(B)

.

Assault in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “serious physical injury,” “physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Assault in the second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.41.210

—

11.41.230

Reckless endangerment - AS

11.41.250

Murder in the second degree - AS

11.41.110(a)(2)

Prior Code Provisions - AS 11.15.140; AS 11.15.220; AS 11.15.225.

TD: I, 43-46.

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, added (a)(5), and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 11,
ch. 11, SLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after October 17, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 66, SLA 1988 (CSHB 237 (Jud)), which amended this section, see 1988 House Journal 2330-2333.

Sec. 11.41.210.
Assault in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of assault in the second degree if

with intent to cause physical injury to another person, that person causes physical injury to another person by means of a dangerous instrument;

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to another person; or

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to another by repeated assaults, even if each assault individually does not cause serious physical injury.

Assault in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 79 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical injury,” “serious physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.220.

TD: I, 46-49.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.41.220.
Assault in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of assault in the third degree if that person

recklessly

places another person in fear of imminent serious physical injury by means of a dangerous instrument;

causes physical injury to another person by means of a dangerous instrument; or

while being 18 years of age or older,

causes physical injury to a child under 12 years of age and the injury would cause a reasonable caregiver to seek medical attention from a health care professional in the form of diagnosis or treatment;

causes physical injury to a child under 12 years of age on more than one occasion;

with intent to place another person in fear of death or serious physical injury to the person or the person’s family member, makes repeated threats to cause death or serious physical injury to another person;

while being 18 years of age or older, knowingly causes physical injury to a child under 16 years of age but at least 12 years of age and the injury reasonably requires medical treatment;

with criminal negligence, causes serious physical injury under AS

11.81.900(b)(59)(B)

to another person by means of a dangerous instrument; or

commits a crime that is a violation of AS

11.41.230(a)(1)

or (2) and, within the preceding 10 years, the person was convicted on two or more separate occasions of crimes under

AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.170

;

AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.220

,

11.41.230(a)(1)

or (2),

11.41.280

, or

11.41.282

;

AS

11.41.260

or

11.41.270

;

AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.420

, or

11.41.425(a)(1)

; or

a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to those of an offense described in (A) — (D) of this paragraph.

In a prosecution under (a)(3) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that, at the time of the alleged offense, the defendant reasonably believed the victim to be 16 years of age or older, unless the victim was under 13 years of age at the time of the alleged offense.

In (a)(5) of this section, when considering whether a conviction has occurred in the preceding 10 years, the date that sentence is imposed is the date that a previous conviction has occurred.

In this section, “the person’s family member” means

a spouse, child, grandchild, parent, grandparent, sibling, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece, of the person, whether related by blood, marriage, or adoption;

a person who lives or has lived, in a spousal relationship with the person;

a person who lives in the same household as the person; or

a person who is a former spouse of the person or is or has been in a dating, courtship, or engagement relationship with the person.

Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 5 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 2, 3 ch 40 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 54 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 96 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical injury,” “serious physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Assault in the first, second, and fourth degree - AS

11.41.200

,

11.41.210

,

11.41.230

Reckless endangerment - AS

11.41.250

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.220

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For statement of legislative intent relating to the application of the penalty imposed under (a)(5) of this section by the Department of Law and the courts, see § 1, ch. 96, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (d); relettered in 1995, at which time subsection (b) was relettered as (d). A reference to “AS

11.81.900(b)

(55)(B)” was renumbered to “AS

11.81.900(b)(56)(B)

” in 2005, was renumbered to “AS

11.81.900(b)(57)(B)

” in 2015, was renumbered to “AS

11.81.900(b)

(58)(B)” in 2018, and was renumbered to “AS

11.81.900(b)(59)(B)

” in 2019, to reflect the 2005, 2013, 2018, and 2019 renumbering of paragraphs in AS 11.81.900(b). Subsection (c) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2008, at which time subsections (c) and (d) were relettered as (d) and (e).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(a), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004.”

Section 9, ch. 96, SLA 2008 provides that (a)(5) of this section “applies to offenses committed on or after September 14, 2008” and that “[r]eferences [in paragraph (a)(5)] to previous convictions apply to convictions for offenses committed on or after September 14, 2008.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511) see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.41.230.
Assault in the fourth degree.

A person commits the crime of assault in the fourth degree if

that person recklessly causes physical injury to another person;

with criminal negligence that person causes physical injury to another person by means of a dangerous instrument; or

by words or other conduct that person recklessly places another person in fear of imminent physical injury.

Assault in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “recklessly,” “criminal negligence” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Assault in the first, second, and third degree - AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.220

Disorderly conduct - AS

11.61.110(a)(5)

Harassment - AS

11.61.120(a)(5)

Arrest without a warrant - AS

12.25.030

Domestic violence injunctions - AS

25.35.010

—

25.35.060

Sentences of imprisonment for misdemeanors -
AS

12.55.135

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.230; AS 11.15.200

TD: I, 48-50.

TD: I, 48-50.

TD: I, 48-50.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For special minimum sentences for this offense when directed at certain officers or medical personnel or when occurring on school grounds or buses, see AS

12.55.135(d)

.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.41.250.
Reckless endangerment.

A person commits the crime of reckless endangerment if the person recklessly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of serious physical injury to another person.

Reckless endangerment is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “serious physical injury” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Murder in the second degree - AS

11.41.110(a)(1)

, (2)

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: I, 51.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.255.
Definition of serious physical injury for offenses against children under 12 under AS 11.41.200 — 11.41.250.

Notwithstanding the definition of “serious physical injury” in AS

11.81.900(b)

, for the purpose of an offense against a child under 12 years of age under AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.250

, unless the context requires otherwise, “serious physical injury” means

physical injury caused by an act performed under circumstances that create a substantial risk of death; or

physical injury that terminates a pregnancy or causes

serious disfigurement;

serious impairment of health by extensive bruising or other injury that would cause a reasonable person to seek medical attention for the child from a health care professional in the form of diagnosis or treatment;

serious impediment of blood circulation or breathing; or

protracted loss or impairment of the function of a body member or organ.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 2012)

Effective dates. —

Section 21,
ch. 70, SLA 2012, makes this section effective July 1, 2012.

Sec. 11.41.260.
Stalking in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of stalking in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.41.270

and

the actions constituting the offense are in violation of an order issued or filed under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

or issued under former AS 25.35.010(b) or 25.35.020;

the actions constituting the offense are in violation of a condition of probation, release before trial, release after conviction, or parole;

the victim is under 16 years of age;

at any time during the course of conduct constituting the offense, the defendant possessed a deadly weapon;

the defendant has been previously convicted of a crime under this section, AS

11.41.270

, or AS

11.56.740

, or a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to a crime under this section, AS 11.41.270, or AS

11.56.740

; or

the defendant has been previously convicted of a crime, or an attempt or solicitation to commit a crime, under (A) AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.250

,

11.41.300

—

11.41.460

, AS

11.56.807

,

11.56.810

, AS

11.61.118

,

11.61.120

, or (B) a law or an ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to a crime, or an attempt or solicitation to commit a crime, under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.250

,

11.41.300

—

11.41.460

, AS

11.56.807

,

11.56.810

, AS

11.61.118

, or

11.61.120

, involving the same victim as the present offense.

In this section, “course of conduct” and “victim” have the meanings given in AS

11.41.270(b)

.

Stalking in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

The location of the designation of subparagraph (a)(6)(A) was incorrect in § 1, ch. 40, SLA 1993 because of a manifest clerical error. The statute as set out above has been corrected.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8,
ch. 40, SLA 1993 provides: “APPLICABILITY.
AS

11.41.260

and

11.41.270

, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, apply to acts committed on or after May 28, 1993. However, to the extent a previous conviction is an element of the offense under
AS

11.41.260

, that previous conviction may have occurred before, on, or after May 28, 1993.”

Legislative history reports. —

For Senate letter of intent in connection with the enactment of this section, see 1993 Senate Journal 1026 — 1027.

Sec. 11.41.270.
Stalking in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of stalking in the second degree if the person knowingly engages in a course of conduct that recklessly places another person in fear of death or physical injury, or in fear of the death or physical injury of a family member.

In this section,

“course of conduct” means repeated acts of nonconsensual contact involving the victim or a family member;

“device” includes software;

“family member” means a

spouse, child, grandchild, parent, grandparent, sibling, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece, of the victim, whether related by blood, marriage, or adoption;

person who lives, or has previously lived, in a spousal relationship with the victim;

person who lives in the same household as the victim; or

person who is a former spouse of the victim or is or has been in a dating, courtship, or engagement relationship with the victim;

“nonconsensual contact” means any contact with another person that is initiated or continued without that person’s consent, that is beyond the scope of the consent provided by that person, or that is in disregard of that person’s expressed desire that the contact be avoided or discontinued; “nonconsensual contact” includes

following or appearing within the sight of that person;

approaching or confronting that person in a public place or on private property;

appearing at the workplace or residence of that person;

entering onto or remaining on property owned, leased, or occupied by that person;

contacting that person by telephone;

sending mail or electronic communications to that person;

placing an object on, or delivering an object to, property owned, leased, or occupied by that person;

following or monitoring that person with a global positioning device or similar technological means;

using, installing, or attempting to use or install a device for observing, recording, or photographing events occurring in the residence, vehicle, or workplace used by that person, or on the personal telephone or computer used by that person;

“victim” means a person who is the target of a course of conduct.

Stalking in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (b)(2) was enacted as (b)(5).
Renumbered in 2011, at which time former (b)(2) — (4) were renumbered as (b)(3) — (5).

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For Senate letter of intent in connection with the enactment of this section, see 1993 Senate Journal 1026 — 1027.

Sec. 11.41.280.
Assault of an unborn child in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of assault of an unborn child in the first degree if

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to an unborn child by means of a dangerous instrument;

with intent to cause serious physical injury to an unborn child or to another person, that person causes serious physical injury to an unborn child;

that person knowingly engages in conduct that results in serious physical injury to an unborn child under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life; for purposes of this paragraph, a pregnant woman’s decision to remain in a relationship in which domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, has occurred does not constitute conduct manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life; or

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to an unborn child by repeated assaults using a dangerous instrument, even if each assault individually does not cause serious physical injury.

Assault of an unborn child in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.282.
Assault of an unborn child in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of assault of an unborn child in the second degree if

with intent to cause physical injury to an unborn child or to another person, that person causes serious physical injury to an unborn child;

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to an unborn child; or

that person recklessly causes serious physical injury to an unborn child by repeated assaults, even if each assault individually does not cause serious physical injury.

Assault of an unborn child in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.289.
Applicability of AS 11.41.280 and 11.41.282.

AS

11.41.280

and

11.41.282

do not apply to acts that

cause serious physical injury or physical injury to an unborn child if those acts were committed during a legal abortion to which the pregnant woman consented or a person authorized by law to act on her behalf consented, or for which consent is implied by law;

are committed under usual and customary standards of medical practice during diagnostic testing, therapeutic treatment, or to assist a pregnancy; or

are committed by a pregnant woman against herself and her own unborn child.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 73, SLA 2006 states that nothing in the Act “is intended to limit or alter a woman’s right to choose the outcome of her pregnancy, as guaranteed by the United States Supreme Court.”